New York, session 2025-2026, S3053.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. On July 1, 2027, the New York state bridge authority shall 2 provide to the governor, the speaker of the assembly, and the temporary 3 president of the senate a report outlining their efforts and progress on 4 decreasing and deterring suicide attempts on authority bridges. Such 5 report shall include at a minimum: 6 1. Information on the recommendations outlined in the Comprehensive 7 Plan for Suicide Prevention, Education, and Awareness report; 8 2. The current status of the implementation of recommendations from 9 this report on each bridge; 10 3. A timeline of any current projects on each bridge related to climb 11 deterrent fencing or for the purposes of decreasing suicide attempts on 12 authority bridges; 13 4. Any barriers to implementing the previous recommendations made, 14 including capital needs and structural challenges on one or more bridg- 15 es; 16 5. Alternative measures or additional actions discovered that may 17 further the purpose of decreasing suicide attempts on authority bridges; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06250-05-6 S. 3053--A 2 1 6. Any efforts outside of the recommendations outlined in such report 2 undertaken by the authority related to suicide prevention on authority 3 bridges; 4 7. Policy recommendations or actions the authority may require from 5 the legislature to implement such recommendations; and 6 8. Any other information that the authority deems relevant to effectu- 7 ate such purpose. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 9 deemed repealed two years after it shall have become a law.